Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3750
Commission; member; removal.

A member of the commission shall be removed for ceasing to (1) be a resident of the state, (2) live in the district from which he or she was appointed, (3) in the case of a grower member, be actually engaged in the growing of dry beans in the state, or (4) in the case of a processor member, be actually engaged in the processing or shipping of dry beans in the state.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 16.